Washington statutes.
RCW 19.09.210

Records requests.

Upon the request of the secretary of state, attorney general, or the county prosecutor, any entity subject to this chapter must submit a financial statement and all requested records containing, but not limited to, the following information:

(1) The gross amount of the contributions pledged and the gross amount collected.

(2) The amount thereof, given or to be given to charitable purposes represented together with details as to the manner of distribution as may be required.

(3) The aggregate amount paid and to be paid for the expenses of such solicitation.

(4) The amounts paid to and to be paid to commercial fund-raisers or charitable organizations.

(5) Copies of any annual or periodic reports furnished by the charitable organization or commercial fund-raiser of its activities during or for the same accounting period.

[ 2011 c 199 s 16; 2007 c 471 s 9; 1993 c 471 s 12; 1986 c 230 s 13; 1983 c 265 s 10; 1982 c 227 s 10; 1977 ex.s. c 222 s 10; 1975 1st ex.s. c 219 s 1; 1973 1st ex.s. c 13 s 21.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1982 c 227: See note following RCW 19.09.100.